Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 1 Duties of Department of Environmental Management

46-1-1.
General duties of director.

The director of the department of environmental management shall have control and supervision of all the harbors and tidewaters of the state, for the preservation, development, and improvement thereof and the promotion of the interests of the state therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1669, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-1-1

.

46-1-2.
Care and supervision of harbors and tidewaters.

The director of the department of environmental management shall have the general care and supervision of all the public harbors and tidewaters within the state, with authority to prosecute for and to cause to be removed all unauthorized obstructions and encroachments therein, and may cause the harbors and public waters to be surveyed and platted and may make such examinations and observations as he or she may deem necessary to protect and develop the rights and interests of the state in the harbors and public waters; and may employ such engineers and other service as may be necessary to this end.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 118, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 144, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-1-2

.

46-1-3.
Offices of department — Seal.

The department of administration shall furnish the department of environmental management with offices in which to transact its business and keep its charts and records. The department of environmental management shall have a seal and shall have engraved thereon the words “Department of Environmental Management, State of Rhode Island,” and the seal shall be affixed to all orders, permits, licenses, and contracts which the director of environmental management is authorized by law to make, and to such other documents and instruments to which the director is authorized to affix his or her signature as the director may deem necessary.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 144, § 17; P.L. 1918, ch. 1669, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 100, 233; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-1-3

.

46-1-4.
Expenses — Employment of personnel.

The director of the department of environmental management may incur such expenses and employ such superintendents, engineers, draftspersons, assistants, agents, watchpersons, clerks, and other persons as the director may deem necessary to enable the department to carry out its duties under chapters 1 — 7 of this title, at a cost not to exceed the sum appropriated therefor.

History of Section.

G.L.1909, ch. 144, § 15; P.L. 1918, ch. 1669, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100, G.L. 1956, §

46-1-4

.

46-1-5.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary for the payment of the salaries of the director and his or her assistants, and for all other expenses of the department; the sum to be paid upon vouchers approved by the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

G.L.1909, ch. 144, § 15; P.L. 1918, ch. 1669, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 14; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-1-5

.

46-1-6.
Annual report.

The director of the department of environmental management shall make an annual report to the general assembly at its January session of the doings of the department during the preceding year, and shall recommend such further legislation as he or she may deem proper for the preservation and improvement of the harbors and public tidewaters and the promotion of the interests of the state connected therewith.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 118, § 16; P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 144, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-1-6

.